District of Columbia statutes.
47-1306

Real property tax assignment; sale and transfers — Right of redemption.

(a)

The owner of any property sold as aforesaid, or any other person having an interest therein at the time of redemption, may redeem the same from such sale at any time within 6 months after the last day of sale by paying to the Collector of Taxes, for the use of the purchaser, his heirs and assigns, the sum mentioned in the certificate of sale therefor, exclusive of surplus with interest thereon at the rate of 18% per annum after the date of such certificate of sale.

(b)

The time period for redemption of properties brought to tax sale under § 47-1205(b), shall be 6 months.

(c)

The time period for redemption of properties brought to tax sale under § 8-807(f), shall be 6 months.

(d)

The time period for redemption of property brought to tax sale under § 34-2109, § 34-2110, or § 34-2407.02, shall be 180 days.

History

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 250, ch. 32, § 4
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 635, ch. 1358, § 1(4)
Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 14(b), 33 DCR 3771
Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-31, § 5(b), 36 DCR 4750
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 9(a)(2), 37 DCR 2620
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 109(c), 42 DCR 3684
Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-153, § 3(c), 43 DCR 4380
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1205.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1306.
1973 Ed., § 47-1005.

Editor's Notes

Application of §§ 104(c), 109(b), (c) and (d), 110, and 111 of Law 11-52: Section 1602 of D.C. Law 11-52 provided that the provisions of §§ 104(c), 109(b), (c), and (d), 110, and 111 of that act shall apply to the real property tax sale conducted in July 1995 and for each sale conducted thereafter.

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.